District of Columbia statutes.
38-1106

Appropriations.

There is authorized to be appropriated from the revenues of the District of Columbia an amount not to exceed $50,000,000 to carry out the purposes of this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter. The authorization made by this section shall include any amounts made available pursuant to § 10-619.

Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1433, Pub. L. 89-791, title III, § 301(a)
1981 Ed., § 31-1406.
1973 Ed., § 31-1606.